ru: Материал иглы: Золото; Никель; Серебрение; Нержавеющая сталь; Титан; Другой
it: Materiale dell’ago: Oro; Nickel; Placcato argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Titanio; Altro
fr: Matériau de l’aiguille: Or; Nickel; Plaqué argent; Acier inoxydable; Titane; Autre
hu: Tű anyaga: Arany; Nikkel; Ezüstözött; Rozsdamentes acél; Titán; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu kim: Vàng; Niken; Mạ bạc; Thép không gỉ; Titanium; Khác
sl-SI: Material igle: Zlato; Nikelj; Posrebrena; Nerjavno jeklo; Titan; Drugo
pl: Tworzywo igły: Złota; Nikiel; Posrebrzany; Stal nierdzewna; Titanium; Inne
en: Needle material: Gold; Nickel; Silver-plated; Stainless steel; Titanium; Other
zh-TW: 用針材質: 金色; 鎳; 鍍銀; 不銹鋼; 鈦; 其他
sv: Nålmaterial: Gyllene; Nickel; Silverpläterad; Rostfritt stål; Titan; Övrigt
ja: 針の素材: ゴールド; ニッケル; 銀メッキ; ステンレススチール; チタン; その他
sk-SK: Materiál ihly: Zlato; Nikel; Postriebrený; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Titán; Iné
da: Nålemateriale: Guld; Nikkel; Forsølvet; Rustfrit stål; Titanium; Andet
pt-BR: Material da agulha: Gold; Níquel; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outro
tr: İğne malzemesi: Gold; Nikel; Gümüş kaplama; Paslanmaz çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
de: Nadelmaterial: Gold; Nickel; Versilbert; Edelstahl; Titan; Sonstiges
ko: 침 소재: 금색; 니켈; 은 도금; 스테인리스 스틸; 티타늄; 기타
lt-LT: Adatos medžiaga: Auksinė; Nikelis; Pasidabruotas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Titanas; Kita
fi: Neulan materiaali: Kulta; Nikkeli; Hopeoitu; Ruostumaton teräs; Titaani; Muu
th: วัสดุสำหรับเข็ม: โกลด์; นิกเกิล; ชุบเงิน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal igle: Zlato; Nikal; Posrebreno; Nehrđajući čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material da agulha: Ouro; Níquel; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outro
el: Υλικό βελόνας: Χρυσό; Νικέλιο; Επάργυρο; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
es: Material de la aguja: Dorado; Níquel; Plateado; Acero inoxidable; Titanio; Otros
nl: Naaldmateriaal: Gold; Nikkel; Verzilverd; Roestvrij staal; Titanium; Andere
cs: Materiál jehly: Zlatá; Nikl; Postříbřený; Nerezová ocel; Titanové; Jiné
nb: Nålmateriale: Gull; Nikkel; Sølvforgylt; Rustfritt stål; Titan; Annet
zh-CN: 针材质: 金色; 镍; 镀银; 不锈钢; 钛; 其他
ro-RO: Material ac: Auriu; Nichel; Placat cu argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Titan; Altele
bg-BG: Материал на иглата: Злато; Никел; Посребрено покритие; Неръждаема стомана; Титан; Други